Dictionaries/ENGLISH/ENGLISH.AFF
#
# $Id: english.aff,v 1.16 1995/01/08 23:23:59 geoff Exp $
#
# Copyright 1992, 1993, Geoff Kuenning, Granada Hills, CA
# All rights reserved.
#
# Redistribution and use in source and binary forms, with or without
# modification, are permitted provided that the following conditions
# are met:
#
# 1. Redistributions of source code must retain the above copyright
#    notice, this list of conditions and the following disclaimer.
# 2. Redistributions in binary form must reproduce the above copyright
#    notice, this list of conditions and the following disclaimer in the
#    documentation and/or other materials provided with the distribution.
# 3. All modifications to the source code must be clearly marked as
#    such.  Binary redistributions based on modified source code
#    must be clearly marked as modified versions in the documentation
#    and/or other materials provided with the distribution.
# 4. All advertising materials mentioning features or use of this software
#    must display the following acknowledgment:
#      This product includes software developed by Geoff Kuenning and
#      other unpaid contributors.
# 5. The name of Geoff Kuenning may not be used to endorse or promote
#    products derived from this software without specific prior
#    written permission.
#
# THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY GEOFF KUENNING AND CONTRIBUTORS ``AS IS'' AND
# ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE
# IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE
# ARE DISCLAIMED.  IN NO EVENT SHALL GEOFF KUENNING OR CONTRIBUTORS BE LIABLE
# FOR ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, EXEMPLARY, OR CONSEQUENTIAL
# DAMAGES (INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, PROCUREMENT OF SUBSTITUTE GOODS
# OR SERVICES; LOSS OF USE, DATA, OR PROFITS; OR BUSINESS INTERRUPTION)
# HOWEVER CAUSED AND ON ANY THEORY OF LIABILITY, WHETHER IN CONTRACT, STRICT
# LIABILITY, OR TORT (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE OR OTHERWISE) ARISING IN ANY WAY
# OUT OF THE USE OF THIS SOFTWARE, EVEN IF ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF
# SUCH DAMAGE.
#
#       Affix table for English
#
# $Log: english.aff,v $
# Revision 1.16  1995/01/08  23:23:59  geoff
# Add a NeXT to the defstringtype statement so that nextispell can
# select it.
#
# Revision 1.15  1994/01/25  07:12:40  geoff
# Get rid of all old RCS log lines in preparation for the 3.1 release.
#
#

nroffchars      ().\\*
texchars        ()\[]{}<\>\\$*.%

# First we declare the character set.  Since it's English, it's easy.
# The only special character is the apostrophe, so that possessives can
# be handled.  We declare it as a boundary character, so that quoting with
# single quotes doesn't confuse things.  The apostrophe is the only
# character that gets such treatment.
#
# We declare the apostrophe first so that "Jon's" collates before "Jonas".
# (This is the way ASCII does it).
#

defstringtype "nroff" "nroff" ".mm" ".ms" ".me" ".man" ".NeXT"

boundarychars '
wordchars [a-z] [A-Z]
boundarychars [.]

altstringtype "tex" "tex" ".tex" ".bib"

# Here's a record of flags used, in case you want to add new ones.
# Right now, we fit within the minimal MASKBITS definition.
#
#            ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ
# Used:      *  *  ****  ** * ***** ***
#            A  D  GHIJ  MN P RSTUV XYZ
# Available:  -- --    --  - -     -
#             BC EF    KL  O Q     W

# Now the prefix table.  There are only three prefixes that are truly
# frequent in English, and none of them seem to need conditional variations.
#
prefixes

flag *A:
    .           >       RE              # As in enter > reenter

flag *I:
    .           >       IN              # As in disposed > indisposed

flag *U:
    .           >       UN              # As in natural > unnatural

# Finally, the suffixes.  These are exactly the suffixes that came out
# with the original "ispell";  I haven't tried to improve them.  The only
# thing I did besides translate them was to add selected cross-product flags.
#
suffixes

flag V:
    E           >       -E,IVE          # As in create > creative
    [^E]        >       IVE             # As in prevent > preventive

flag *N:
    E           >       -E,ION          # As in create > creation
    Y           >       -Y,ICATION      # As in multiply > multiplication
    [^EY]       >       EN              # As in fall > fallen

flag *X:
    E           >       -E,IONS         # As in create > creations
    Y           >       -Y,ICATIONS     # As in multiply > multiplications
    [^EY]       >       ENS             # As in weak > weakens

flag H:
    Y           >       -Y,IETH         # As in twenty > twentieth
    [^Y]        >       TH              # As in hundred > hundredth

flag *Y:
    .           >       LY              # As in quick > quickly

flag *G:
    E           >       -E,ING          # As in file > filing
    [^E]        >       ING             # As in cross > crossing

flag *J:
    E           >       -E,INGS         # As in file > filings
    [^E]        >       INGS            # As in cross > crossings

flag *D:
    E           >       D               # As in create > created
    [^AEIOU]Y   >       -Y,IED          # As in imply > implied
    [^EY]       >       ED              # As in cross > crossed
    [AEIOU]Y    >       ED              # As in convey > conveyed

flag T:
    E           >       ST              # As in late > latest
    [^AEIOU]Y   >       -Y,IEST         # As in dirty > dirtiest
    [AEIOU]Y    >       EST             # As in gray > grayest
    [^EY]       >       EST             # As in small > smallest

flag *R:
    E           >       R               # As in skate > skater
    [^AEIOU]Y   >       -Y,IER          # As in multiply > multiplier
    [AEIOU]Y    >       ER              # As in convey > conveyer
    [^EY]       >       ER              # As in build > builder

flag *Z:
    E           >       RS              # As in skate > skaters
    [^AEIOU]Y   >       -Y,IERS         # As in multiply > multipliers
    [AEIOU]Y    >       ERS             # As in convey > conveyers
    [^EY]       >       ERS             # As in build > builders

flag *S:
    [^AEIOU]Y   >       -Y,IES          # As in imply > implies
    [AEIOU]Y    >       S               # As in convey > conveys
    [SXZH]      >       ES              # As in fix > fixes
    [^SXZHY]    >       S               # As in bat > bats

flag *P:
    [^AEIOU]Y   >       -Y,INESS        # As in cloudy > cloudiness
    [AEIOU]Y    >       NESS            # As in gray > grayness
    [^Y]        >       NESS            # As in late > lateness

flag *M:
    .           >       'S              # As in dog > dog's

