Dictionaries/ENGLISH/ENGLISH.DIC
actor/AMS
adequacy/IS
adopt/DGRSVZ
adulterate/DGNS
afford/DGS
aided/U
airplane/MS
allocator/AMS
allude/DGS
am/NS
ameliorate/DGNV
amortise/DGS
amount/DGRSZ
amp/SY
amphibious/PY
annotate/DGNSVX
antenna/MS
anthem/MS
applicable/I
appropriate/DGNPSTVXY
arguable/IU
armour/DGMRSZ
arrangement/AMS
artistic/I
assert/DGRSVZ
associator/MS
assure/DGRSZ
attach/DGRSZ
attachment/MS
authorization/AMS
autocorrelate/N
avalanche/DGS
ball/DGRSZ
baptist/MS
bare/DGPRSTY
baroque/PY
barred/U
baste/DGNRSX
bawl/DGRS
beat/GJNRSZ
behavior/DMS
besmirch/DGS
Bilbo/M
blanket/DGRSZ
blaze/DGRSZ
bleed/GJRSZ
bloody/DGPT
boards/I
boo/HS
bounty/DMS
branch/DGJS
bred/IU
breezy/PR
Bresenham/M
brew/DGRSZ
bribe/DGRSZ
broad/NPRTXY
bungalow/MS
burnish/DGRS
bush/DGJS
butting/A
calculated/PY
camouflage/DGS
cap/MRSZ
capable/IP
capitalise/DGRSZ
captures/A
carouse/DGR
caste/GHMRSZ
ceremonious/PUY
certify/DGNRSXZ
chartering/A
chatter/DGRSYZ
childless/P
Chomsky/M
chronicle/DRSZ
cityscape/S
civilize/DGRSZ
clarify/DGNRSX
classy/PRT
clemency/I
clenched/U
climb/DGRSZ
close/DGJPRSTYZ
cognisance/AI
cognizance/AI
collaborate/DGNSVX
colour/DGJMRSZ
combined/A
come/GHJRSTYZ
commoner/MS
communal/Y
commutable/I
compare/DGRS
comprehensible/IP
concentrate/DGNSVX
conciliate/DNSVX
conclusive/IPY
configuration/AMS
conflict/DGSV
congeniality/U
congest/GSV
conspicuous/IPY
consummate/DNSVXY
contest/DGRSZ
contrast/DGRSVZ
contrivance/MS
copper/DGMS
cork/DGRSZ
correct/DGPSVY
counterweight/MS
courses/A
crafty/PR
crazy/PRT
cream/DGRSZ
credibility/I
cruise/DGRSZ
crystalized/AU
culminate/DGNS
cumulate/DGNSX
curs/ADGSV
dang/D
dark/NPRSTY
date/DGRSV
deal/GJRSZ
dear/HPRSTY
decompose/DGRS
deface/GRS
defencive/PSY
definition/AMS
degree/DMS
delicious/PSY
delineate/DGNSVX
demarcate/DNS
denture/IS
deplete/DGNSVX
deprave/DGRS
designing/AU
desired/U
differ/DGRSZ
diffuse/DGNPRSVXYZ
dig/ST
diminutive/PY
direct/DGPSVY
disagreement/MS
discernible/I
discriminate/DGNSVX
disguise/DGRS
dismiss/DGRSVZ
disquieting/Y
distill/DGRSZ
distorted/U
distributed/A
dome/DGS
donor/S
drown/DGJRS
dumpy/PR
dusty/PRT
ear/DHSY
eclipse/DGS
educate/DGNSVX
efficiency/IS
eighty/HS
elevate/DGNSX
elucidate/DGNSV
encrypt/DGS
encumbered/U
engrave/DGJRSZ
entail/DGRS
erudite/NY
esthetic/MS
estimate/DGNSVX
excise/DGNSX
exclusion/RSZ
exclusive/PY
excused/U
execute/DGNRSVXZ
exhortation/MS
expedient/IY
expense/DGSV
exult/DGS
fair/DGPRSTY
favor/DGJMRSZ
fell/DGPRSZ
fetching/Y
fettered/U
fidelity/I
fifteen/HS
filled/AU
find/GJRSZ
finish/DGJRSZ
fluctuate/DGNSX
fog/MS
follow/DGJRSZ
for/HT
formations/I
formative/PY
formulate/DGNSX
foul/DGPSTY
four/HS
frame/DGJMRSZ
fraternizing/U
gangly/R
gasp/DGRSZ
generated/A
gentleman/Y
germinate/DGNSVX
gibbous/PY
give/GHRSZ
gland/MSZ
graduate/DGNSX
great/NPRSTY
groan/DGRSZ
groom/DGMRS
gusty/P
ha/HS
handsomely/U
handy/PRT
haste/DGJS
haul/DGRSZ
hear/GHJRSTZ
heres/I
hierarchical/Y
hold/GJNRSZ
hollow/DGPRSTY
hull/DGMRS
hunt/DGRSZ
identified/U
illuminate/DGNSVX
impersonate/DGNSX
impostor/MS
impregnable/P
incept/DGSV
incremental/Y
indeterminate/NPY
individualize/DGRSZ
innovate/DGNSVX
insulate/DGNSX
intelligibly/U
interpret/DGRSVZ
interrupt/DGRSVZ
intoxicate/DGN
inventive/PY
irrational/PSY
iterative/AY
joke/DGRSZ
joust/DGRS
jurist/S
labor/DGJRSZ
labourings/U
lacerate/DGNSVX
Latin/M
leafy/RT
let/IMS
license/DGMRS
light/DGNPRSTXYZ
live/DGHJPRSTYZ
load/DGJRSZ
loath/DGPRSY
lodge/DGJRSZ
look/DGRSZ
lucky/PRT
lumpy/PR
mambo/S
markable/A
maturate/DGSVX
mechanism/MS
mediate/DGNPSVXY
memorise/DGRSZ
meshed/U
metalwork/GJR
mincing/Y
misbehave/DRS
morn/GJ
motel/MS
mummify/DNX
mutate/DGNSVX
mute/DGPRSTY
name/DGRSYZ
natures/A
nervous/PY
nineteen/HS
nor/H
northeaster/Y
numerator/MS
obey/DGRS
obliterate/DGNSVX
offence/AMSV
oppose/DGRS
orchestrate/DGNRSX
out/DGJRS
outstrip/S
pa/HS
packaged/AU
pale/DGPRSTY
paranormal/Y
passe/DGNRSVXZ
pasts/A
pasture/DGMRS
perform/DGRSZ
pertinacious/PY
perturbation/MS
photocopy/DGRS
phrase/DGJS
placate/DGNRSV
plate/DGJRS
pocket/DGS
poll/DGNRS
ponderous/PY
produce/ADGRSZ
profile/DGRS
progress/DGSV
projected/U
proof/DGMRS
prosecute/DGNSX
psychosocial/Y
pupate/DGNS
quadrillion/H
quarantine/MS
queer/PRTY
questionable/P
queue/DMRSZ
quo/H
ramble/DGJRSZ
rank/DGJPRSTYZ
rear/DGRS
recluse/MNSV
rehabilitate/DGNSVX
reintroduce/DGS
relieve/DGRSZ
repellent/Y
resuscitate/DGNSV
retrain/DGS
retrieve/DGRSZ
rid/GJRSZ
ride/GJRSZ
rolls/U
round/DGPRSTY
rum/NX
rusticate/DGNS
salacious/PY
scandal/MS
scintillate/DGNS
scrounge/GRS
scrutable/I
scrutinize/DGRSZ
search/DGJRSZ
second/DGRSYZ
sell/AGRSZ
seventeen/HS
shaken/U
shampoo/RS
shorten/DGRS
shrewd/PTY
six/HS
sixty/HS
slick/PRSYZ
smutty/PR
snuggle/DGS
sober/DGPRSTY
Sol/Y
solubility/I
speak/GRSZ
spell/DGJRSZ
spited/A
stamen/MS
stanch/RT
standardization/AMS
state/DGMNRSVXY
steady/DGPRST
stiff/NPRSTXY
stimulate/DGNSVX
sublime/DGPRY
substantially/U
subtle/PRT
successive/PY
sulfurous/PY
sunder/DG
surface/DGPRSZ
susceptible/I
swell/DGJS
tantalizingly/S
ten/HMS
tensor/MS
tessellate/DNS
tether/DGS
thirty/HS
threat/NSX
timeless/PY
tired/APY
tolerant/IY
too/H
trace/DGJRSZ
tranquilise/DGJRSZ
transformed/U
tricky/PRT
trifle/DGRS
trusty/PRS
tumble/DGRSZ
tuneful/PY
twenty/HS
undumper/M
utilises/A
variant/ISY
variegate/DN
venture/DGJRSZ
verse/ADGNRSX
vindictive/PY
violate/DGNSVX
visualization/AMS
vocalization/MS
vocative/Y
vote/DGRSVZ
wards/AI
warm/DGHPRSTYZ
whit/DGNRTX
whiten/DGRSZ
wrestle/DGJRS
yield/DGRS
you/H
